Washington statutes.
RCW 19.85.050

Agency plan for review of business rules—Scope—Factors applicable to review—Annual list.

(1) Within one year after June 10, 1982, each agency shall publish and deliver to the office of financial management and to all persons who make requests of the agency for a copy of a plan to periodically review all rules then in effect and which have been issued by the agency which have an economic impact on more than twenty percent of all industries or ten percent of the businesses in any one industry. Such plan may be amended by the agency at any time by publishing a revision to the review plan and delivering such revised plan to the office of financial management and to all persons who make requests of the agency for the plan. The purpose of the review is to determine whether such rules should be continued without change or should be amended or rescinded, consistent with the stated objectives of applicable statutes, to minimize the economic impact on small businesses as described by this chapter. The plan shall provide for the review of all such agency rules in effect on June 10, 1982, within ten years of that date.

(2) In reviewing rules to minimize any significant economic impact of the rule on small businesses as described by this chapter, and in a manner consistent with the stated objectives of applicable statutes, the agency shall consider the following factors:

(a) The continued need for the rule;

(b) The nature of complaints or comments received concerning the rule from the public;

(c) The complexity of the rule;

(d) The extent to which the rule overlaps, duplicates, or conflicts with other state or federal rules, and, to the extent feasible, with local governmental rules; and

(e) The degree to which technology, economic conditions, or other factors have changed in the subject area affected by the rule.

(3) Each year each agency shall publish a list of rules which are to be reviewed pursuant to this section during the next twelve months and deliver a copy of the list to the office of financial management and all persons who make requests of the agency for the list. The list shall include a brief description of the legal basis for each rule as described by RCW 34.05.360, and shall invite public comment upon the rule.

[ 1989 c 175 s 74; 1982 c 6 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.